New York, session 2025-2026, A221.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The civil rights law is amended by adding a new section 2 50-h to read as follows: 3 § 50-h. Intrusion upon seclusion. 1. A person shall have a cause of 4 action against any person who intentionally intrudes, physically or 5 otherwise, upon the solitude or seclusion of another or their private 6 affairs or concerns if such intrusion would be highly offensive to a 7 reasonable person. 8 2. In any action commenced pursuant to subdivision one of this 9 section, the finder of fact, in its discretion, may award injunctive 10 relief, punitive damages, compensatory damages and reasonable court 11 costs and attorney's fees. 12 3. Liability for a violation of subdivision one of this section shall 13 not depend upon any publicity given to the person whose interest is 14 invaded or to their affairs. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 16 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01918-01-5